test/src/morphology/V-jeqllw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - jeʼllõ: # Verb 'to live' - full paradigm
     jeʼllõ+V+IV+Inf: jeʼllõ
     je’llõ+V+Ger: je’llõs
     je’llõ+V+Sup: jelām
     je’llõ+V+Sup+Ine: jelāmõs
     je’llõ+V+Sup+Ela: jelāmõst
     je’llõ+V+Sup+Tra: jelāmõks
     je’llõ+V+Sup+Abe: jelāmõt
     jeʼllõ+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jelāb
     jeʼllõ+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: jelād
     jeʼllõ+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jelāb
     je’llõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: jelāt
     je’llõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: jelābõd
     je’llõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: jelīz
     je’llõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [[jelīzt, jelīztõ]]
     je’llõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [[jelīzt, jelīztõ]]
     je’llõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: je’l
     je’llõ+V+Cond+Sg3: jelāks
     je’llõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: jelā
     je’llõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: je’llõ
     je’llõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: jelāgid
     je’llõ+V+Jus+Sg3: jelāg
     je’llõ+V+QuoSg3: jelāji
     je’llõ+V+ActPrfPrc: je’llõn
     je’llõ+V+PssPrfPrc: je’ldõd
